Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Chapter 117. Internet Commerce

§ 4190.
Interfering with Internet ticket sales.

A person shall not intentionally use a computer program or other software intended to interfere with or circumvent, on a ticket seller’s website, an equitable ticket buying process established by the seller for tickets of admission to a sporting event, theatre, musical performance, or place of public entertainment or amusement of any kind.

A person who violates this section, in a civil action brought by the seller, shall be subject to:

appropriate equitable relief;

reasonable attorney’s fees and costs;

actual damages suffered; and

statutory damages of up to $1,500.00 per ticket, payable to the seller.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4191.
Removal of booking photographs from the Internet; fees prohibited.

As used in this section, “booking photograph” means any photograph taken by a law enforcement office or other authorized person pursuant to 20 V.S.A. chapter 117.

A person who posts or otherwise disseminates a booking photograph on the Internet shall not solicit or accept a fee or other consideration to remove, delete, correct, modify, or refrain from posting or disseminating the booking photograph if requested by the depicted person.

A person who violates subsection (b) of this section shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $1,000.00 for the first violation and not more than $2,500.00 for each subsequent violation.

A person who sustains damages or injury as a result of a violation of this section may bring an action in Superior Court for damages, injunctive relief, punitive damages in the case of a willful violation, and reasonable costs and attorney’s fees. The court may issue an award for the person’s actual damages or $500.00 for a first violation or $1,000.00 for each subsequent violation, whichever is greater. This subsection shall not limit any other claims a person who sustains damages or injury as a result of a violation of this section may have under applicable law.

This section shall not be construed to limit a person’s liability under any other law.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 62

, § 4.